Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-206.01
Attorney General; actions relating to boundary lines; duty.

The Attorney General shall commence, prosecute, or defend all actions relating to Nebraska's boundary line which affect the rights and interests of Nebraska landowners whose land is being taxed by Nebraska political subdivisions on or after September 13, 1997. The Attorney General shall also take any other action that is required in his or her judgment to protect all rights and interests of such landowners.

Laws 1997, LB 588, § 1.